New York, session 2025-2026, S8273.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Section 5 of chapter 118 of the laws of 1969, relating to a 2 separate union free school district in the town of Greenburgh in the 3 county of Westchester, as added by chapter 179 of the laws of 2024, is 4 amended to read as follows: 5 § 5. a. Notwithstanding section three and four of this act, the Green- 6 burgh North Castle Union Free School District number 12 of the towns of 7 Greenburgh and North Castle in the county of Westchester shall continue 8 to constitute a separate union free school district during the 2024-2025 9 school year and thereafter and shall continue to have and enjoy all the 10 powers and privileges of a union free school district under the 11 provisions of the education law. For purposes of continuing to provide 12 instruction to students enrolled in the school district during the 13 2024-2025 school year and thereafter, the territory of the Greenburgh 14 North Castle Union Free School District number 12 created by this chap- 15 ter shall include property identified in lease agreements executed by 16 the school district including the [agency] lease for the school facility EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD13275-01-5 S. 8273 2 1 located at 71 Broadway, Dobbs Ferry in the town of Greenburgh, county of 2 Westchester, 108 Shonnard Place in the city of Yonkers, county of West- 3 chester [and 1700 Old Orchard Place in the village of Valhalla pursuant 4 to chapter 224 of the laws of 2010;], 29 Marshall Road, Wappingers Falls 5 in the towns of Wappinger and Poughkeepsie, county of Dutchess, 623 6 Blooming Grove Turnpike, in the town of New Windsor, county of Orange 7 and 45 East Gainsborg Avenue in the village of West Harrison pursuant to 8 chapter 264 of the laws of 2017 as well as properties leased and/or 9 owned by Rising Ground, Inc. in Westchester, Bronx or Dutchess counties 10 at which a residential treatment center affiliated with Greenburgh North 11 Castle Union Free School District number 12 is operated provided, howev- 12 er, that the commissioner of education has approved the use of any 13 building used by the school district for purposes providing instruction 14 and provided further, however, that the use of the property located at 15 623 Blooming Grove Turnpike, in the town of New Windsor, county of 16 Orange, shall be discontinued on or about June 30, 2025. 17 b. Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, subject to approval of the 18 department of education and the office of children and family services 19 and any applicable terms of the Capital Facilities Financing Act or 20 applicable approval of the dormitory authority, the board of education 21 of the Greenburgh North Castle Union Free School District number 12 22 created by this chapter shall be authorized to affiliate with a child 23 care institution as defined in section 4001 of the education law other 24 than the St. Christopher's School St. Christopher's - Jennie Clarkson 25 Child Care Services Corporation. Upon state approval of such affil- 26 iation, the board of education of the Greenburgh North Castle Union Free 27 School District number 12 as created by this chapter shall be comprised 28 of seven members, five elected by the board of directors of such child 29 care institution and two public members appointed pursuant to chapters 30 628 and 629 of the laws of 2004. The board members shall serve for terms 31 of up to four years. Additionally, following state approval as described 32 in this subsection, education responsibility for students placed in the 33 affiliated child care institution shall be governed by article 81 of the 34 education law. 35 c. Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, the board of education of 36 the Greenburgh North Castle Union Free School District number 12 created 37 by this chapter shall be authorized to affiliate with Rising Ground, 38 Inc., a child care institution as defined in section 4001 of the educa- 39 tion law. Upon such affiliation, the board of education of the Green- 40 burgh North Castle Union Free School District number 12 as created by 41 this chapter shall be comprised of between five and nine members, with 42 members to be elected by the board of directors of Rising Ground, Inc. 43 and with two such board members being public members appointed pursuant 44 to chapters 628 and 629 of the laws of 2004. The board members shall 45 serve for terms of up to four years. Additionally, education responsi- 46 bility for students placed in the affiliated child care institution 47 shall be governed by article 81 of the education law. 48 § 2. Subdivision b of section 5 of chapter 118 of the laws of 1969, 49 relating to a separate union free school district in the town of Green- 50 burgh in the county of Westchester, is REPEALED. 51 § 3. This act shall take effect July 1, 2025, or the date upon which 52 the lease agreement for property located at 623 Blooming Grove Turnpike, 53 in the town of New Windsor, county of Orange expires, whichever date 54 occurs first. Provided, further, that the Greenburgh North Castle Union 55 Free School District number 12 shall notify the legislative bill draft- 56 ing commission upon the expiration of such lease agreement in order that S. 8273 3 1 the commission may maintain an accurate and timely effective data base 2 of the official text of the laws of the state of New York in furtherance 3 of effectuating the provisions of section 44 of the legislative law and 4 section 70-b of the public officers law.